Virginia statutes. Title 44. Military and Emergency Laws.
Chapter 3.3. Transportation of Hazardous Radioactive Materials.

§ 44-146.30.
Department of Emergency Management to monitor transportation of hazardous radioactive materials.

The Coordinator of the Department of Emergency Management, pursuant to regulations promulgated by the Virginia Waste Management Board, will maintain a register of shippers of hazardous radioactive materials and monitor the transportation within the Commonwealth of those hazardous radioactive materials, as defined by the Virginia Waste Management Board, which may constitute a significant potential danger to the citizens of the Commonwealth in the event of accidental spillage or release. The regulations promulgated by the Board shall not be in conflict with federal statutes, rules, or regulations. Other agencies and commissions of the Commonwealth shall cooperate with the Virginia Waste Management Board in the formulation of regulations as herein provided.

History.

1979, c. 434; 1984, c. 745; 1988, c. 30; 2000, c. 309.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 309 substituted “Management” for “Services” in the section catchline, and substituted “Emergency Management” for “Emergency Services” near the beginning of the first sentence.

Law Review.

For article discussing issues relating to toxic substances litigation, focusing on the Fourth Circuit, see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 247 (1982).

For note, “The Role of Localities in the Transportation and Disposal of Nuclear Wastes,” see 18 U. Rich. L. Rev. 655 (1984).